Utah statutes.
71-9-1.   Contract to provide assistance to veterans and their widows and
children.
The Department of Veterans' Affairs is authorized to contract with the
American Legion, the Disabled American Veterans, and the Veterans of Foreign
Wars of the United States, as organized in this state, to provide, especially
in the outlying areas of the state, assistance to veterans, their widows, and
children as follows:
(1)  to disseminate information regarding all laws applicable to veterans,
their widows, and children in the preparation, presentation, and prosecution
of claims against the United States arising by reason of service in the
military, naval, or air services;
(2)  to assist veterans, their widows, and children in the establishment of
all rights and the procurement of all benefits which may accrue to them under
the laws of this state or of the United States;
(3)  to cooperate with any and all agencies and instrumentalities of this
state or of the United States having to do with the employment or reemployment
of veterans;
(4)  to cooperate with any and all agencies and instrumentalities of this
state or of the United States and make a representative and information
available on a rotating basis in the outlying areas of the state;
(5)  to assist veterans in obtaining such preference for employment as may be
authorized by the laws of this state or of the United States; and
(6)  to assist veterans, their widows, and children in obtaining emergency
relief, and to that end cooperate with such agencies and instrumentalities of
this state or of the United States as have been or may be established for the
purpose of extending emergency relief.
